Utah statutes.
75-3-302.   Informal probate -- Duty of registrar -- Effect of informal probate.

After receipt of an application requesting informal probate of a will, the registrar, upon making the findings required by Section 75-3-303 shall issue a written statement of informal probate if at least 10 days have elapsed since the date of the notice required by Section 75-3-306, or if at least 120 hours have elapsed since the decedent's death and all persons entitled to notice under Section 75-3-306 have waived such notice in writing. Informal probate is conclusive as to all persons until superseded by an order in a formal testacy proceeding. No defect in the application or procedure relating thereto which leads to informal probate of a will renders the probate void.

